District of Columbia statutes.
22-2404

False swearing.

(a)

A person commits the offense of false swearing if under oath or affirmation he or she wilfully makes a false statement, in writing, that is in fact material and the statement is one which is required by law to be sworn or affirmed before a notary public or other person authorized to administer oaths.

(b)

Any person convicted of false swearing shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 3 years, or both.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 403, 29 DCR 3976
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(z), 60 DCR 2064
Compromises and agreements concerning recordation tax on deeds, penalties for certain acts, see § 42-1110.
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.13.
1981 Ed., § 22-2513.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $2,500” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(z) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.